Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2.
(1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $330,000,000, to be allocated to state agencies  for state employee com-
pensation changes.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 3. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $120,000,000, to be  allocated to state agencies for additional compen-
sation changes to support state employee recruitment and retention.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $75,000,000, to be allocated  to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 5. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, to be allocated to  the Oregon Health Authority and the
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 1
Department of Human Services for caseload costs the agencies are unable to  mitigate during
the interim legislative periods.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated to the Department of Justice for expenses
of district attorneys for victim assistance,  investigation and temporary staffing and other
one-time, nonroutine prosecution expenses related to nonunanimous jury convictions.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 7.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated  for expenses related to nonunanimous jury
convictions.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 8. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to be allocated for expenses related to  the unrepresented
defendants/persons crisis.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 9. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $6,170,768, to be allocated for expenses related to public defense.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$6,071,500 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and  transferred to the Department of Corrections, for operations and
health services.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5504), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for operations and health
services, is decreased by $6,071,500.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the  Improving People’s
Access to Community-based Treatment,  Supports and Services Account established by ORS
430.233.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission from the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based  Treatment, Supports and Services Account established
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 2
by ORS 430.233, for grants to counties and federally recognized  Indian tribes for community
supports and services for individuals with mental health or substance abuse disorders leading
to their involvement with the criminal justice system.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5505), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is  increased by
$650,000, for the Family Preservation Project operated by the YWCA of Greater Portland.
SECTION 15. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Illegal Marijuana
Market Enforcement Grant Program Fund established  by section 15, chapter 103, Oregon
Laws 2018.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5505), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission,
is increased by  $5,000,000, for additional grants under the Illegal Marijuana Market Enforce-
ment Grant Program established under section 13, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018.
SECTION 17. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for the crime victims and survivor services division,
for deposit in the Oregon Domestic and Sexual Violence Services Fund established  by ORS
147.453, to assist victims of domestic violence or sexual assault with  emergency shelter and
safety planning.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Justice, for the crime victims  and survivor services division, and the Oregon Domestic and
Sexual Violence Services Fund established by ORS  147.453, to assist victims of domestic vi-
olence or sexual assault with emergency shelter and safety planning.
SECTION 19. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $6,000,000, for the crime victims and survivor services division,
to assist victims of domestic violence or sexual assault with housing assistance.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  the Criminal Justice Division,
is increased by $821,346, for organized retail theft investigations.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of Justice, for the child
advocacy division, is increased by $6,612,847, for an organizational structure realignment.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5033),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to
the Public Employees Retirement System for the Employer Incentive Fund Program,  is in-
creased by $7,310,000, for state matching funds.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 3
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5503), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the Commission  for the Blind, is increased by
$234,260, for position reclassifications.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill  5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $350,000, for Disability
Rights Oregon to conduct legal reviews of guardianship pleadings.
SECTION 25.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5520), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal
Older Americans Act funds received from the Department of  Human Services, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5520), collected or received by the  Long Term Care Ombudsman, is in-
creased by $300,000, to allow the agency to administer a grant to increase access to  public
guardian services.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 5514), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  the Criminal Justice Division,
is increased by $457,758, for an animal cruelty resource prosecutor.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department from  American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Judicial Department, for the renovation of
Harney County Courthouse annex.
SECTION 28.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$100,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Judicial Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services  and transferred to the Judicial Department, for planning and costs
associated with replacement of the Umatilla County Courthouse.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $42,549
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Judicial  Department from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State
Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and transferred  to the Judicial Department, for planning and costs associated with replace-
ment of the Hood River County Courthouse.
SECTION 30.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $818,333,  for distribution to the Oregon State Bar for immigration
legal services.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5035), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the  Corporation
Division, is increased by $538,735, to support the operations of the Corporation Division.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 4
SECTION 32. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the  General Fund, the amount of $100,000, for a study on the advantages and disad-
vantages of decriminalizing prostitution.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5530), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to  the Department of
State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities, is decreased by $2,171,581.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  State Police by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5530), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for fish and wildlife
enforcement, is increased by $2,171,581.
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for community programs,
is increased by $12,604,039, for increased rates for behavioral rehabilitation services.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2  (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023, (Enrolled Senate Bill
5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Youth Authority, for community
programs, is increased by $201,478, for increased rates for behavioral  rehabilitation services.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by  the Oregon Youth Authority, for community
programs, is increased by $8,332,544,  for increased rates for behavioral rehabilitation ser-
vices.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled
House Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the State School  Fund, is in-
creased by $42,412,064.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5015),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
lottery moneys  allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to
the Department of Education for the State School Fund, is decreased by $42,412,064.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 14, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the  Department of Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account estab-
lished under ORS 327.250, for operations, is increased by  $559,094 for planning support to
replace the State School Fund information technology system.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 14, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the  Department of Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account estab-
lished under ORS 327.250, for operations, is  increased by $4,826,632 for continuing the devel-
opment of a professional learning system by the Educator Advancement Council.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 13 (1),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 5
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payments of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department  of Education from
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under  ORS 327.250, for the High
School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund, is increased by $14,716,811.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 13 (3),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payments of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department  of Education from
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under ORS  327.250, for all other
grants, is increased by $5,000,000 for the African American/Black Student Success Plan.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 14, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Department of Education from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  estab-
lished under ORS 327.250, for operations, is increased by $748,833 for the  establishment of a
migrant/multilingual education team.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, other than those described in sections 9 and 15, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5014), collected or received by the Department  of Education, for
operations, is increased by $1,459,658 for the establishment  of a migrant/multilingual educa-
tion team.
SECTION 46.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses  described in sections 7 and 15, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate  activity tax funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of Education,  for capital bonding, is increased by
$100,000,000 for matching grants made to school  districts for construction or improvement
to school facilities through the Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching Program.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses  described in sections 7 and 15, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate  activity tax funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of Education, for operations, is increased  by $1,130,149
for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses, other than expenses  described in sections 7 and 15, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous
Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, corporate  activity tax funds and federal funds, col-
lected or received by the Department of Education,  for capital bonding, is increased by
$15,000,000 for Connecting Oregon Schools Fund broadband grants.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,968,610 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 6
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Education, for debt service.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and  Care by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5013),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for operations,
is increased by $401,243 for compliance and investigations staff.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5013), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of Early Learning and Care, for
operations, is increased by $1,606,297, for compliance and investigations staff.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and  Care by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5013), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for early
learning programs, is increased by $15,000,000  to improve case rates in the Employment Re-
lated Day Care program.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and Care  by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5013), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for early
learning programs, is increased by $1,719,000 for the Imagination Library program.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and Care  by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5013), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for early
learning programs, is increased by $5,000,000 for technical assistance to child  care providers
to access the Child Care Infrastructure Fund.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Early Learning and  Care by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5013),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for operations,
is increased by $186,943 to design and implement the Child Care Infrastructure Fund techni-
cal assistance program.
SECTION 56.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5013), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payments of ex-
penses from federal funds collected or received  by the Department of Early Learning and
Care, for  operations, is increased by $216,168 to design and implement the Child Care
Infrastructure Fund technical assistance program.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $100,000, for distribution to the  Oregon State
University Institute of Natural Resources for the purpose  of convening a statewide water
conference to facilitate learning and relationship-building between  sectors, identify research
needs and develop a statewide research and learning agenda.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $500,000, for  distribution to the University of
Oregon Just Futures Institute to conduct research to understand and address  water needs
of environmental justice communities and to award grants.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission by section 1 (10), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 7
statewide public services, is increased by $135,000, for distribution to Oregon  State
University’s Southern Oregon Research  and Extension Center to partner with growers in
affected areas to increase capacity  to monitor, trap and suppress vine mealybug found in
Oregon vineyards.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill  5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for Higher
Education Coordinating Commission programs and operations, is increased by $306,000, for
distribution to Portland State University, Portland Community  College, Chemeketa Commu-
nity College, Treasure Valley Community College and  Central Oregon Community College to
expend on the delivery of college-in-prison courses for the 2023-24 academic year.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $195,000, for distribution to Portland State
University for the purpose of implementing a  Project Rebound Resource Center to provide
social supports, emergency financial needs, academic guidance and  tutoring and professional
development opportunities to  help formerly incarcerated students complete their degrees
post-release.
SECTION 62.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill  5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for Higher
Education Coordinating Commission programs and operations, is  increased by $10,000,000 for
deposit in the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund established under ORS 476.698.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections  12 to 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for Higher Education Coordinating Commission  programs and related grants,
is increased by $10,000,000, for payments out of the Oregon  Conservation Corps Fund estab-
lished under ORS 476.698.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for public
university statewide programs, is increased by $250,000, for  distribution to the Oregon Cli-
mate Service at  Oregon State University to support the State Climatologist of Oregon posi-
tion.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11)(a), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt
service on outstanding general  obligation bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public uni-
versities, is increased by $2,136,545.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (11)(d), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt
service on general obligation bonds  sold for implementing the Financial Assistance Manage-
ment Information Systems project, is increased by $856,842.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 8
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for Higher Education Coordinating  Commission programs and related grants,
is increased by $4,661,449 for costs of bond issuance.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-Q  of the
Oregon Constitution, collected or received by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion, for the Financial Aid Management Information Systems project.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Aviation,  for
pavement maintenance, is increased by $12,984, for a position reclassification.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5004), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Aviation, for
operations, is decreased by $12,984, for a position reclassification.
SECTION 71. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,200,000, for distribution to the  Mid-
Columbia Water Commission to implement the Morrow and Umatilla Drought Relief  Aquifer
Recharge and Aquifer Storage and Recovery Project.
SECTION 72. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Farmers Market Association  to support local food system resilience through increased pro-
ducer and community access and to  mitigate the impacts of drought and related disasters
such as closures due to drought.
SECTION 73. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for distribution to the  Oregon
Farmers Market Association to increase grants  to nonprofit farmers markets to cover costs
associated with acceptance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.
SECTION 74. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for distribution  to Cherriots
for the  purpose of collaborating with the Department of Transportation, the Department of
Environmental Quality, community members in the City of Salem  and economists and busi-
ness leaders in the City of Salem to study  the feasibility of developing a rail streetcar system
in the City of Salem.
SECTION 75. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to  Pueblo
Unido PDX for facilitating the creation of  language proficiency evaluations for interpreters
of indigenous languages spoken in present-day Mexico and Central and South America.
SECTION 76. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 9
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for  distribution to Oregon
Worker Relief for payments to individuals  who provide interpretation services of languages
that are the national languages of  small countries from which local populations have emi-
grated, languages spoken by small ethnic minority groups or languages spoken by  indigenous
groups.
SECTION 77. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $832,000, for the payment of state  legal
costs related to sections 1 and 2, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 78. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $4,000,000, for the payment of court-
awarded compensation and reasonable attorney fees related to sections 1 and  2, chapter 105,
Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$156,795,418 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from American
Rescue Plan Act Capital Projects Fund moneys received by the Oregon  Department of Ad-
ministrative Services, for the purpose  of transfer to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for broadband infrastructure programs.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (12), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  Senate Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received by the
Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for Oregon Department of Administrative
Services debt service, is increased by $508,034.
SECTION 81.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received  by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise asset management, is  in-
creased by $50,000 for bond issuance costs associated  with bonds issued under Article XI-Q
of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 82.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services from lottery moneys allocated from
the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund for debt service and  related costs
for bonds issued in previous biennia, is increased by $1,391,178.
SECTION 83. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,900,000, for  the purpose of providing
reimbursement to local  governments, community mental health programs established under
ORS 430.620 and providers for  payment of awards, settlements and expenses that are in-
curred in civil actions arising out of the provision of services  pursuant to ORS 161.365 and
161.370.
SECTION 84. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 10
July 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000, for the purpose of collaborating
with county governments and community mental health  programs established under ORS
430.620 to study barriers that prevent local governments, community  mental health pro-
grams and providers from obtaining insurance coverage for liability arising out of the  pro-
vision of services pursuant to ORS 161.365 and 161.370.
SECTION 85. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $2,400,000, for deposit in the Universal
Representation Fund established under section 1, chapter 88, Oregon  Laws 2022, for dis-
bursement to Oregon Worker Relief for legal services through the program established under
section 2, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 86.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (15), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  Senate Bill
5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received from  charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received by the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for special governmental payments, is in-
creased by $2,400,000, for disbursement to Oregon Worker Relief for legal services through
the program established under section 2, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 87. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon Community Food System Network for grants for small-scale farms  and
ranches: $2,650,000.
(2) Oregon Association of Water  Utilities (OAWU) to build the Water System Training
Center: $1,600,000.
(3) Oregon Community Food System  Network to develop food hubs and regional food
system infrastructure: $1,500,000.
(4) Baker County for infrastructure improvement projects  (water, sewer, road,
broadband): $2,250,000.
(5) City of Philomath for Philomath  Frolic and Rodeo (Skirvin Park) stands replacement
and lighting upgrade: $1,900,000.
(6) Polk County for the Polk County Mental Health Treatment/Crisis Center: $2,000,000.
(7) City of La Pine for the La Pine Incubator/Spec. Building Project: $1,500,000.
(8) City of Depoe Bay for the Depoe Bay  docks and pilings restoration project: $1,500,000.
(9) City of Salem for the renovations of ARCHES and  Wallace Early Learning Center
sheltering service: $1,850,000.
(10) La Clinica for La Clinica Acute Care Clinic expansion: $2,200,000.
(11) Vietnam War Memorial  Fund for the Vietnam War Memorial on the Oregon State
Capitol Grounds: $1,000,000.
(12) Oregon Center for Creative  Learning for the Oregon Center for Creative Learning
expansion: $2,000,000.
(13) City of Springfield for the Mill Street reconstruction: $2,000,000.
(14) Klamath County for construction of the Klamath Crimson Rose facility: $2,000,000.
(15) Gresham-Barlow School District for a school-based health center: $1,500,000.
(16) Children’s Cancer Therapy Development Institute for children’s cancer research
expansion/equipment: $1,000,000.
(17) Native American  Youth & Family Center for NAYA campus improvements and
building remodel: $1,150,000.
(18) Row River Fire Response for emergency communication equipment: $143,000.
(19) Boring, Oregon Foundation to purchase property for a community center: $850,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 11
(20) Wildflower Preschool & Child Care LLC for a new child care facility in Myrtle Creek:
$800,000.
(21) East Salem Community Center for the El Campo Community Soccer Field: $450,000.
(22) City of Milwaukie for the Johnson Creek Solar Project: $375,000.
(23) City of Sheridan for homeless community shelters: $225,000.
(24) Boys & Girls Club of Western Treasure Valley for revitalizing and enhancing the
safety of the clubhouse: $100,000.
(25) Kellogg Rural Fire District for the construction of a main fire station: $1,200,000.
(26) North Douglas County  Fire & EMS to purchase property and to build student and
volunteer housing for fire station: $800,000.
(27) East Salem Community Center for HVAC replacement: $175,000.
(28) The Dalles Civic Auditorium for sound and lighting for theatre: $50,000.
(29) Every Child Linn Benton  (ECLB) for ECLB programs to mobilize community to uplift
children and families impacted by foster care: $250,000.
(30) Community Action Program of East Central Oregon (CAPECO) to build food bank
center: $1,250,000.
(31) FOOD for Lane County to purchase land for Food Farm: $1,150,000.
(32) Marion Polk Food Share for mobile pantries: $1,025,000.
(33) Oregon  Food Bank for warehouse expansion and renovation at multiple locations:
$3,020,000.
(34) ACCESS, Inc. of Medford for food bank warehouse expansion: $800,000.
(35) Community Connection of Northeast Oregon for food bank equipment: $500,000.
(36) Clatsop Community Action for food bank warehouse renovations  and equipment up-
grade: $570,000.
(37) Columbia Pacific Food Bank for equipment upgrade: $520,000.
(38) Feed’em Freedom Foundation for campus expansion: $980,000.
(39) Feeding Umpqua for warehouse renovation and truck purchase: $630,000.
(40) Klamath Lake County Food Bank for warehouse renovation and paving: $580,000.
(41) Linn Benton Food Share for delivery vehicles and equipment upgrade: $780,000.
(42) NeighborImpact for food bank equipment and operations funding: $790,000.
(43) Oregon Coast Community Action for a second warehouse  to serve Curry County:
$600,000.
(44) Yamhill Community Action  Partnership for warehouse renovations and delivery ve-
hicle costs: $580,000.
(45) Food Share of Lincoln County to purchase land and for building a new  warehouse for
pantry: $530,000.
(46) Ella Curran Community Food Bank for community food bank expansion: $690,000.
(47) South Douglas Food Bank for HVAC Upgrade: $5,000.
(48) High Desert Partnership for infrastructure to deliver and spread  water in Harney
County: $1,500,000.
(49) City of Happy Valley for the Happy Valley Library Expansion: $2,000,000.
(50) Oregon Metro Transit-Oriented Development  Program for the 82nd Avenue Property
Acquisition Fund to secure  land to build affordable housing and affordable commercial spaces
in preparation for future development: $5,000,000.
(51) King City for the King City Park path repair and resurfacing project: $137,000.
SECTION 88.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from proceeds of lottery bonds, collected or received by the Oregon  Department
of Administrative Services,  for the provision of grants to the following entities for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Willamette Falls Locks Authority for the  Willamette Falls Locks and Canal Restora-
tion: $7,359,200.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 12
(2) City of Redmond for the Redmond Public Safety Center: $3,045,328.
(3) Serendipity Center, Inc. therapeutic school for Portland campus expansion: $2,845,294.
(4) Lane County for the Behavioral Health Stabilization Center: $5,058,410.
(5) Homes For Good Housing Agency for the Naval Reserve  Affordable Housing and Early
Learning Center Project in Eugene, Oregon: $4,958,766.
(6) City of Oregon City for the  Main Street Connective Corridor Project Phase II: 10th
Street to 15th Street: $4,052,728.
(7) Latino Network for the La Plaza Esperanza service hub for Portland and  Gresham
residents: $4,051,914.
(8) Family Justice Center  of Washington County for the Family Peace Center of
Washington County: $4,052,728.
(9) Washington County for the Center for  Addictions Triage and Treatment (CATT):
$5,060,949.
(10) Port of Portland for the  Terminal 2 Building Innovation Hub mass timber factory:
$5,060,949.
(11) Benton County for the Benton County Emergency Operations Center: $5,060,949.
(12) City of Redmond for the Northpoint Vista Mixed-Income Neighborhood Project:
$5,060,949.
(13) Eugene Civic Alliance for the Civic Park Project: $5,060,949.
(14) Jefferson County for  Central Oregon Community College -Early Childhood Education
and Health Careers Center: $4,052,728.
SECTION 89.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $8,000,000, to be allocated to the Department of Early Learning
and Care for expanding access to the Employment Related Day Care program.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 90. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,900,000, to be allocated to the Department  of Education for
providing stipends to licensed educators and classified  school employees working in special
education during the 2024-25 school year.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate  Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for public health, is in-
creased by $20,000,000, for public health modernization.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for Health Systems Division
programs, is decreased by $98,300,000, to adjust for revenue savings from the Oregon Health
and Science University intergovernmental transfer.
SECTION 93.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for public health, is  in-
creased by $1,500,000, for the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 13
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  for the Oregon State Hos-
pital, is increased by $1,890,996, to promote diversity, equity and inclusion.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for Health Systems Division
administration, is decreased by $91,356, to rebalance diversity, equity and inclusion efforts
agencywide.
SECTION 96.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for health policy and ana-
lytics, is decreased by $110,322, to rebalance diversity, equity and inclusion  efforts
agencywide.
SECTION 97.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for public health, is de-
creased by $745,855, to rebalance diversity, equity and inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for central  services, is in-
creased by $1,374,184, to rebalance diversity, equity and inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority,
for central services, is increased by $103,882,  to rebalance diversity, equity and inclusion ef-
forts agencywide.
SECTION 100.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 5 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for  Health Systems Division administration, is decreased by $107,247, to rebalance
diversity, equity and inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for  health policy and analytics, is decreased by $110,322, to rebalance diversity,
equity and inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for public health, is decreased by $72,501, to rebalance diversity, equity  and
inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 103. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 14
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for  central services, is increased by $192,917, to rebalance diversity, equity and
inclusion efforts agencywide.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for Health Systems Di-
vision programs, is increased by $4,936,539, for adult intensive services and diversion.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for  Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $8,631, for adult intensive
services and diversion.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 5 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $1,551,419, for  adult inten-
sive services and diversion.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt service, is in-
creased by $1,839,084, for debt service on general  obligation bonds for projects at the Oregon
State Hospital.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana  tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased  by $140,000, for bond
issuance costs related to capital construction projects at the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$27,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax  receipts, provider taxes and
Medicare receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for debt service.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana  tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 15
Authority, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $50,000,000, for  lottery
bonds issued to build community acute psychiatric facility capacity.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (9), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased  by $525,793, for lot-
tery bond issuance costs.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for debt service, is increased by $2,507,603,  for
debt service on lottery bonds for building community acute psychiatric facility capacity.
SECTION 113. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to be  allocated for the transfer of the Public Defense
Services Commission to the executive branch.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Commission for the Blind by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5503), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is increased by $952,421,
to complete phase  two of the case management modernization project and comply with
Oregon Department of Administrative Services information technology requirements.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $20,947,614,  to phase out the current caseload of 300 individuals
who are pursuing a case by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services  and transition those
individuals to community-based housing and wrap-around resources.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5519), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for administrative expenses, is increased by  $496,133, for data security
improvements.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$16,500,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for expenses associated  with distribution center management, licens-
ing and enforcement information technology systems.
SECTION 118. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$977,217 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Oregon Liquor and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 16
Cannabis Commission,  for cost of issuance of bonds issued for distribution center manage-
ment, licensing and enforcement information technology systems.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5519), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission, for debt service, is increased by $9,510,389.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
administrative expenses by the Bureau of Labor and Industries  from the Wage Security
Fund, is increased by $553,535, for wage and hour investigation capacity.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is  increased by
$37,407, for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled Senate  Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is increased by
$215,670, for continuation of the Eastern Oregon apprenticeship support position.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and Industries,  is in-
creased by $5,113,857, for a rebalance action.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5515), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
administrative expenses by the Bureau  of Labor and Industries from the Wage Security
Fund, is decreased by $5,113,857, for a rebalance action.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$14,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to  Article XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution, collected or received by  the Department of Revenue, for Phase 2 of the Elec-
tronic Valuation Information System.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (10), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5034), collected
or received by the Department of Revenue, for debt service and related costs, is increased
by $265,000, for costs of issuance of general obligation bonds.
SECTION 127.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of  Revenue by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  debt service and re-
lated costs,  is increased by $2,448,479, for debt service for Phase 2 of the Electronic Valuation
Information System.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (2),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 17
(Enrolled House Bill 5034),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Property Tax Di-
vision, is increased by $100,000, for training costs related to  Phase 2 of the Electronic Valu-
ation Information System.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled House Bill  5035), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Administrative
Services Division, is increased by $23,746, for changes to compensation of  management posi-
tions.
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled House Bill 5035), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Elections Division,
is increased by $49,573, for changes to compensation of management positions.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5035), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Secretary of State, for the Administra-
tive Services  Division, is increased by $152,474, for changes to compensation of management
positions.
SECTION 132.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5035), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Secretary of State, for the Archives
Division, is increased by $22,488, for changes to compensation of management positions.
SECTION 133. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$320,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Justice, for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds.
SECTION 134. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,508,271 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Justice, for the cost of debt service.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$21,200,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Justice, for the Legal Tools Replacement Information Technology Project 3.0.
SECTION 136. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,893,246,  for the Legal Tools Replacement Information Tech-
nology Project 3.0.
SECTION 137. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$260,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Judicial  Depart-
ment, for the cost of debt service.
SECTION 138. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$813,106 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 18
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,831,894 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the project costs for the Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$8,831,894 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for local matching funds for the project costs for the Benton County Courthouse.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$30,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the project costs for the Clackamas County Courthouse.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$30,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for local matching funds for the project costs for the Clackamas County Courthouse.
SECTION 143. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$12,575,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the project costs for the Morrow County Courthouse.
SECTION 144. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$12,575,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for local matching funds for the project costs for the Morrow County Courthouse.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,600,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for the project costs for the Curry County Courthouse.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$10,600,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Judicial Department  from the Oregon Courthouse Capital Con-
struction and Improvement Fund established by  section 64, chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013,
for local matching funds for the project costs for the Curry County Courthouse.
SECTION 147. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  for the Special
Programs, Contracts  and Distributions Division, is increased by $1,523,964, for the imple-
mentation of chapter 400, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 148. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $2,690,922, to provide assistance
to local governments to adopt climate friendly and equitable communities.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 19
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House  Bill 5027), for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, for the planning program, is increased by $309,078 for  administration for climate
friendly and equitable communities.
SECTION 150. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,920,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee, for the cost of issuing general obligation bonds and project costs
for the Capitol Accessibility, Maintenance and Safety project.
SECTION 151.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Legislative Administration Committee by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5516), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $19,054,817.
SECTION 152.
(1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $35,000,000, to be  allocated for the state’s natural disaster
prevention, preparedness, response and recovery.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 153. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision by section  1, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5528), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023,
is increased by $322,600, for the payment of legal representation  for juvenile commutations
and adults in custody before the board.
SECTION 154. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for  improving safety and increasing access to
walking, biking and transit on state highways that serve as community main streets.
SECTION 155. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for pedestrian  access improvements along
Southwest Hall Boulevard.
SECTION 156. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to  the City of Independence
for the Chestnut Street Bridge project.
SECTION 157. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,000,000, for distribution to the City of Independence
for Western Interlock off-site transportation improvements.
SECTION 158. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for distribution to the Klamath County  Eco-
nomic Development Association for the Klamath Northern Railroad project.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 20
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for the  local government program, is increased by $20,000,000, for distribution to the Port
of Hood River for the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge project.
SECTION 160. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department  of Transportation,
for the local government program, is increased  by $20,000,000, for distribution to Multnomah
County for the Earthquake Ready Burnside Bridge project.
SECTION 161. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for the local government program, is  increased by $5,000,000, for distribution to the City of
Bend for the Hawthorne Avenue Pedestrian and Bicycle Overcrossing project.
SECTION 162. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal  funds
received as reimbursement from the United States Department of Transportation,  but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), collected or received by the Department of Transportation,
for the local government program, is increased by $514,349, for the cost of issuance  of bonds.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040), for project delivery and support, is increased  by $250,000,000,
for the Interstate Bridge Replacement project.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5040), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds
received as reimbursement  from the United States Department of Transportation, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5040),  for project delivery and support, is increased by $1,825,000,
for the cost of issuance of bonds.
NOTE: Section 165 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 166. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriations, there is appro-
priated to the Department of the  State Fire Marshal, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for deposit into the State Fire Marshal
Mobilization Fund established by section 51, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  Senate
Bill 1049).
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 21
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$2,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of the State Fire Marshal from the State  Fire
Marshal Mobilization Fund established by section 51, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 1049), for costs related to mobilizing local fire service personnel.
SECTION 168. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of the State Fire Marshal by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5036), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, is increased
by $10,000,000, for wildfire mitigation and response.
SECTION 169. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5036), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of the State Fire Marshal,
is increased by $545,174, for agency staff.
SECTION 170. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Agriculture by section 1  (3), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, for natural
resources, is increased by  $312,100, for activities to mitigate the impact of the vine mealybug.
SECTION 171. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Agriculture by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5002), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for adminis-
trative and support services, is increased by $1,000,000, to  provide grants through the Wolf
Depredation Compensation and Financial Assistance Grant Program.
SECTION 172. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000,  for deposit into the Community Renewable In-
vestment Fund established in section 33, chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 173. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$20,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department  of Energy from the Community Renewable
Investment Fund established by section 33, chapter 508,  Oregon Laws 2021, for community
renewable energy project grants.
SECTION 174. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Rooftop  Solar Incentive
Fund established by section 3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$10,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the State Department of Energy from the Rooftop Solar Incentive
Fund established by section  3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019, for providing rebates for the
purchase, construction or installation of solar electric systems and paired solar  and storage
systems.
SECTION 176.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Energy by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5016), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for energy  develop-
ment services, is increased by $951,606.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5016), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Department of Energy, for  ad-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 22
ministrative services, is increased by $513,354, for additional  staff to support administration
of new energy programs.
SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5018), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of
bonds for the Orphan Site Account and  federal funds from congestion mitigation and air
quality grants, drinking water protection, laboratory accreditation and woodstove  grants and
for smoke monitoring laboratory services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5018), collected
or received by the Department of Environmental Quality, for land quality, is increased by
$5,333,333, for project costs and for the cost of issuing bonds.
SECTION 179.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5018),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $1,825,995.
SECTION 180. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5509),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Habitat
Division, is increased by $100,000, for Department of Justice legal charges.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5509), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for the Fish
Division, is increased by $1,000,000, for an assessment of fish hatcheries.
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5509), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for the Fish
Division, is decreased by $957,216, for a rebalance of drought package funding.
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5509),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Habitat
Division, is increased by $957,216, for a rebalance of drought package funding.
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,181,834 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife from the Oregon Con-
servation and Recreation Fund established by ORS 496.252, for wildlife passage infrastructure
projects and the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$8,750,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the State Department of Fish and Wildlife from the Fish Passage
Fund established by ORS 497.139, for fish passage infrastructure projects.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5509), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $238,271.
SECTION 187.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries by  section 1 (1),
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5510), for the  biennium beginning July
1, 2023, for geological survey, is increased by $381,097, for the Oregon mapping  program for
water and mineral resources.
SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 23
Bill 5510), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not described in
section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5510), collected or received
by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries, for geologic survey, is increased
by $37,097, for the Oregon mapping program for water and mineral resources.
SECTION 189.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5504),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Department of Cor-
rections, for central administration and administrative services, is increased  by $855,000, for
the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Corrections by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5504), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $4,079,231.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,184,175 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Corrections, for debt service.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5031), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described
in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), collected or received
by the  Oregon Military Department, for operations, is increased by $140,030, for the cost of
bond issuance.
SECTION 193. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Military Department by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5031), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for debt service, is
increased by $982,730.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$721,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon  Military Department,
for debt service.
SECTION 195.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$190,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Depart-
ment of Emergency Management, for debt service.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5530),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Police, for  administrative services, agency support and criminal justice information services,
is increased by $676,814, for the cost of bond issuance.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 24
SECTION 197. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of State Police by section 1  (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5530), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $5,726,014.
SECTION 198. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for facility programs, is increased by $590,562, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for program support, is increased by $103,954, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 200. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth Authority,
for program support, is increased by $7,746,046, for the Juvenile Justice Information System
upgrade project.
SECTION 201.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section  1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  program support, is
increased by $3,418,078 for the non-bondable costs of the Juvenile Justice Information System
upgrade project.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Youth Authority by  section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5541), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt service,  is in-
creased by $4,308,625.
SECTION 203. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$56,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Oregon Youth
Authority, for debt service.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 1, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, is in-
creased by $216,349, for administration of  tax credits for affordable housing lenders of limited
equity cooperatives.
SECTION 205. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (3),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  the Personal Tax and
Compliance Division, is increased by $991,057, for the costs of implementing the child tax
credit established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3235).
SECTION 206.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Revenue  by section 1 (6), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5034), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for the Information
Technology Services Division, is increased by $203,896 for the costs  of implementing the child
tax credit established by  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3235).
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 25
SECTION 207. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds described in
section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5034), collected  or received by
the Department of Revenue, for the Personal Tax and  Compliance Division, is increased by
$20,225, for the costs of implementing  the child tax credit established by section 2, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3235).
SECTION 208. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5034), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements
from federal service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds described in
section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5034), collected  or received by
the Department of Revenue, for  the Information Technology Services Division, is increased
by $60,904, for the costs  of implementing the child tax credit established by section 2, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3235).
SECTION 209. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Land Conservation and Development by section 96, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3409), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, to
provide grants for  green infrastructure projects under section 24, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3409), is decreased by $6,500,000.
SECTION 210. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,500,000, for deposit into the
Community Green  Infrastructure Fund established by section 25, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3409).
SECTION 211. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,500,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, from the
Community Green  Infrastructure Fund established by section 25, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3409).
SECTION 212. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Secretary of State by section  1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled House Bill 5035), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for the Elections Division,
is increased by $325,474, to continue a translation services position.
SECTION 213. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $241,000,000,  to adjust for
revenue savings from the  Oregon Health and Science University intergovernmental transfer.
SECTION 214. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 5 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from federal funds,  excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 26
Authority, is increased by $344,400,000, to adjust for revenue savings from  the Oregon Health
and Science University intergovernmental transfer.
SECTION 215. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections  12 to 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for programs and related grants,  is increased by $2,500,000, for payments out
of the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund established by  section 8,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2049).
SECTION 216. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for programs and related grants, is increased  by $2,150,000, for payments out
of the Oregon Cybersecurity Workforce Development Fund established by section  9, chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2049).
SECTION 217. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  excluding lottery
funds and federal funds and funds described in sections  12 to 16, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission, for programs and related grants, is increased by $250,000, for payments out  of
the Oregon Cybersecurity Grant Program Fund established by section 10, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2049).
SECTION 218.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5502),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in
section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502), collected or received
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for enterprise goods and services, is
increased by $537,447, to provide the Shared Financial  Services program with staffing re-
sources to address increasing workload from new client agencies.
SECTION 219.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$220,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund es-
tablished under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, to study and  make re-
commendations for policy proposals on the tax treatment of military pensions.
SECTION 220. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5020), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research  projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5020), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,
for capital improvement, is increased by $4,820,771.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 27
SECTION 221. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5020), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research  projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5020), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,
for agency administration, is increased by $308,422, for  general obligation bond costs of is-
suance.
SECTION 222. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5020), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds from  the United States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5020), collected or received by the State Forestry Department,
for debt service, is increased by $1,137,893.
SECTION 223. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5020),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for debt service, is in-
creased by $1,497,550.
SECTION 224. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$18,763,236 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Department of State Lands from the Oregon Abandoned and
Derelict Vessel Fund established  by section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 2914).
SECTION 225. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5527),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for community  support and grants, is increased by $10,155,705, for the
expenditure of lottery bond proceeds and costs of bond issuance related  to the Oregon Main
Street program.
SECTION 226. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $100,000, for distribution to Portland State University,  for
Oregon Consensus, for facilitation of a tribal water work group.
SECTION 227. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with  or contracts from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration  and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources Department, for the  director’s office, is increased by
$10,000,000, for grants and loans  from the Water Supply Development Account established
by ORS 541.656.
SECTION 228.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 28
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with  or contracts from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the  United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources  Department, for the director’s office, is increased by
$50,000,000, for grants and loans for irrigation modernization projects from the  Water Supply
Development Account established by ORS 541.656.
SECTION 229.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with  or contracts from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration  and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources Department, for the  director’s office, is increased by
$5,000,000, for distribution of a grant to the City of West Linn for  the I-205 Abernethy Bridge
water line replacement project.
SECTION 230.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and including federal
funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the Bureau of Recla-
mation of the United States Department of the  Interior, the United States Army Corps of
Engineers, the  United States Geological Survey, the Bonneville Power Administration and
the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds not
described in section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5043), collected
or received by the Water Resources  Department, for the director’s office, is increased by
$700,425, for bond issuance costs.
SECTION 231.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5043), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Water Resources Department for debt service, is increased by $2,632,567.
SECTION 232. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there are ap-
propriated to the Water Resources Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the provision  of grants to the following en-
tities, for the following purposes:
(1) City of Beaverton, South Cooper Mountain Nonpotable (Purple  Pipe) Project:
$2,500,000.
(2) North Unit Irrigation District, Infrastructure Modernization Project: $2,000,000.
(3) Deschutes River Conservancy, Conserving Water Through Piping and Improved  Mon-
itoring and Measurement: $1,500,000.
(4) Rogue River Irrigation District, Fourmile Creek Project: $1,530,000.
(5) City of Monroe Water, Prefilter and Automated Controls Infrastructure: $1,500,000.
(6) City of St. Paul, Water Reservoir Improvement Project: $636,000.
(7) City of Bay City, Earthquake Isolation Valves for Water Reservoirs: $225,000.
(8) City of Halsey, New Well: $300,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 29
(9) City of Sodaville, Jackson Well Conversion to Municipal Use: $370,000.
(10) City of Falls City, Water Main Line Replacement Project: $591,750.
SECTION 233.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 51, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
2010), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Oregon Watershed  Enhancement Board for the purpose of carrying out section 1,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2010), through use of funds from  the
Community Drinking Water  Enhancement and Protection Fund established by section 4,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2010), is increased by $4,000,000.
SECTION 234. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5539),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Watershed En-
hancement Board, for operations, is increased by $52,728, for costs of  bond issuance related
to the Community Drinking  Water Enhancement and Protection Fund established by section
4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 2010).
SECTION 235. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department, from American Rescue Plan  Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for
operations, is decreased by $287,800.
SECTION 236. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for operations, is increased by $287,800.
SECTION 237. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for business, innovation and trade, is  decreased by $166,476, to facilitate
the transfer of three positions  from the business, innovation and trade division to the oper-
ations division.
SECTION 238. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department,  for operations, is increased by $166,476, to facilitate the transfer of
three positions from the business, innovation and trade division to the operations division.
SECTION 239. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8d, chapter 25,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
4), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses
by the Oregon Business Development Department from the University Innovation Research
Fund established under ORS  285A.230 for any purpose related to economic development for
which moneys in the University Innovation Research Fund may be  used, is decreased by
$10,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 30
SECTION 240. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for business,  innovation and trade, is increased by $10,000,000, for
payment of  expenses from the University Innovation Research Fund established under ORS
285A.230, for any purpose related to economic development for which moneys in  the Univer-
sity Innovation Research Fund may be used.
SECTION 241. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 11, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
3410), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department for the purposes  of ORS 285B.165 to
285B.171, is decreased by $3,000,000.
SECTION 242. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 8 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, innovation and
trade, is increased by $3,000,000, for the purposes of ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171.
SECTION 243.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 7 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department, from the Broadband Fund  es-
tablished by section 4, chapter 17, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first special session), for operations,
is decreased by $380,782.
SECTION 244. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 7 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by  the Oregon Business Development Department, from the Broadband Fund es-
tablished by section 4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020  (first special session), for
infrastructure, is decreased by $106,619,218.
SECTION 245. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for
payment of expenses from American Rescue Plan Act Capital  Projects Fund moneys received
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department and deposited in the Broadband Fund established by  section
4, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session), for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 380,782
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $156,414,636
SECTION 246.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$50,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Business Development Department for  the provision of
grants and loans from the Child Care Infrastructure Fund established by section 3,  chapter
___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3005).
SECTION 247. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 31
opment Department, for infrastructure, is  increased by $10,000,000, for the purpose of
providing grants under ORS 285B.420 for levee projects as defined in  ORS 285B.410, from the
Levee Project Grant Fund established by ORS 285B.421.
SECTION 248. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 4 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for infrastructure, is increased by the  following amounts, for the
issuance of grants from proceeds of lottery revenue bonds, for the following projects:
(1) Umatilla  Electrical Cooperative Association Industrial Site Utility Expansion:
$5,000,000.
(2) City of Phoenix Industrial Improvements, South Valley Employment Center:
$4,500,000.
(3) City of Aumsville Wastewater System Improvements: $5,000,000.
(4) City of Molalla New Wastewater Treatment Plant: $5,000,000.
(5) City of Newport  Wastewater Treatment and Conveyance System Improvements:
$3,825,000.
(6) Port of Coos Bay Channel Modification: $20,000,000.
SECTION 249.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for arts, is  increased by $3,000,000, for the provision of grant funding
for to the  Native Arts and Cultures Foundation, for Center for Native Arts and Cultures
renovations, from the Cultural Resources Economic  Fund established in section 6, chapter
786, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 250. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for lottery bond debt ser-
vice, is increased by $4,012,383.
SECTION 251. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,100,715 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business
Development Department, for debt service.
SECTION 252. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for  infrastructure, is increased by $1,583,950, for payment of issuance
costs associated with lottery revenue bonds.
SECTION 253. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Devel-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 32
opment Department, for  arts, is increased by $46,495, for payment of issuance costs
associated with lottery revenue bonds.
SECTION 254. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, to be distributed as grants  to the
following venues:
(1) Aladdin Theater: $269,623.
(2) Alberta Rose Theater: $107,925.
(3) Alberta Street Pub: $49,892.
(4) Artichoke Music: $28,690.
(5) Ashland Armory: $136,133.
(6) Atlantis Lounge: $44,811.
(7) Barnstormers Theatre: $14,051.
(8) The Belfry: $20,431.
(9) BodyVox: $24,934.
(10) Bossanova Ballroom: $65,317.
(11) Britt Festival Pavilion: $67,151.
(12) Cascades Theatrical Company: $33,418.
(13) Coaster Theatre Playhouse: $14,051.
(14) CoHo Productions: $13,348.
(15) Cottage Theatre: $23,981.
(16) Craterian Performances Company: $112,128.
(17) Crystal Ballroom: $285,580.
(18) Cuthbert Amphitheater: $107,511.
(19) Dante’s: $103,672.
(20) Domino Room: $20,127.
(21) Doug Fir Lounge: $145,877.
(22) Egyptian Theatre: $28,102.
(23) The Elgin Opera House: $30,507.
(24) Elsinore Theatre (Historic): $109,368.
(25) 45 East, LLC: $128,301.
(26) Gallery Theater: $17,089.
(27) The Goodfoot: $57,730.
(28) Hawthorne Theatre: $171,267.
(29) Headwaters Theatre/Water in the Desert: $13,386.
(30) Historic Rogue Theatre: $30,380.
(31) Holocene: $111,267.
(32) HQ LaGrande: $4,310.
(33) Hult Center for the Performing Arts: $203,166.
(34) Imago Theatre: $39,748.
(35) Jack London Revue: $34,785.
(36) Jazz Station/Willamette Jazz Society: $11,393.
(37) KALA: $7,595.
(38) Kelly’s Olympian: $19,747.
(39) Kickstand Comedy (formerly Brody Theater): $33,057.
(40) Lakewood Center for the Arts: $45,570.
(41) Laurelthirst Public House: $30,836.
(42) Liberty Theater: $33,627.
(43) Lincoln City Cultural Center: $17,089.
(44) Little Theatre on the Bay/Liberty Theatre (North Bend): $45,665.
(45) Majestic Theatre: $51,266.
(46) McDonald Theatre: $115,463.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 33
(47) Midtown Ballroom: $31,899.
(48) Milagro Theatre: $13,948.
(49) Mississippi Studios: $159,522.
(50) New Expressive Works: $13,606.
(51) Newport Performing Arts Center (two stages): $60,001.
(52) Northwest Children’s Theater: $43,671.
(53) OK Theater: $9,494.
(54) Old Church Concert Hall: $47,469.
(55) Oregon Contemporary Theatre: $28,102.
(56) Pentacle Theatre: $14,290.
(57) Portland Institute for Contemporary Art: $101,845.
(58) Pickathon: $230,634.
(59) Polaris Hall: $99,654.
(60) Portland Playhouse: $46,265.
(61) Revolution Hall: $235,604.
(62) Roseland Theater: $263,706.
(63) Ross Ragland Theater: $130,873.
(64) Sawdust Theatre: $3,798.
(65) Shaking the Tree Theatre: $34,204.
(66) Shedd Institute for the Arts: $200,094.
(67) The Siren Theater: $22,405.
(68) Stage 722: $97,516.
(69) Star Theater: $81,646.
(70) Theatre in the Grove: $14,051.
(71) Tower Theatre (Bend): $186,694.
(72) Vault Theater (Bag and Baggage): $33,862.
(73) Volcanic Theatre Pub: $27,397.
(74) White Eagle: $63,175.
(75) Whiteside Theatre: $20,127.
(76) Wildish Community Theater: $32,564.
(77) Wonder Ballroom: $147,309.
(78) WOW Hall/Community Center for the Performing Arts: $41,393.
SECTION 255.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for distribution as a grant to
Literary Arts, Inc. for renovation of its new headquarters in Portland.
SECTION 256. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following
amounts are established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the following
purposes:
(1) City of Estacada New Wastewater Facility Project: $2,414,622.
(2) Port of Morrow, South Morrow County  Water and Transportation Infrastructure
Development: $2,500,000.
(3) Harney County Industrial Improvements, B Street Extension: $2,250,000.
(4) City of Waldport Industrial Park Sewer expansion: $2,200,000.
(5) Wheeler County Industrial Development: $2,400,000.
(6) City of Lowell Water Treatment Plant Upgrades: $306,420.
(7) Illinois Valley Fire District Extension of Water and Sewer Lines: $984,500.
(8) City of Port Orford Water Recycling Project: $750,000.
(9) Tillamook County Shilo Levee Rehabilitation: $1,267,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 34
SECTION 257. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for infrastructure,  is increased by $150,000,000, for the seismic
rehabilitation grant program.
SECTION 258. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 4 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department, for infrastructure, is increased by $1,455,000, for the costs  of issuing
general obligation bonds for the seismic rehabilitation program.
SECTION 259. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5524), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for
debt service, is increased by $12,648,814.
SECTION 260.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5524),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Devel-
opment Fund to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for infrastructure, is in-
creased by $534,259.
SECTION 261. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section  1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5020), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for fire  protection, is
decreased by $1,869,713.
SECTION 262. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5037), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds collected or  received by the Department of State Lands, for Common
School Fund programs, is increased by $500,000,  for the expenditure of federal grant funds
received from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
SECTION 263. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $167,008, for the Chief Financial Office,
for grant administration.
SECTION 264.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $4,300,000, for deposit in the Universal
Representation Fund established by section 1, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022, for disburse-
ment to Oregon Worker Relief as the fiscal agent under section  1, chapter 88, Oregon Laws
2022.
SECTION 265.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (15), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5502), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  federal
funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in
section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5502),  collected or received
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for special governmental payments,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 35
is increased by $4,300,000, for disbursement to Oregon Worker  Relief as the fiscal agent un-
der section 1, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 266. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5016), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds  collected or received by the State Department of Energy, is increased by
$5,061,278, for expenditures related to the State Energy Program  grant awarded by the
United States Department of Energy.
SECTION 267. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$54,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Environmental Quality, for debt service.
SECTION 268. Section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 104),  is re-
pealed.
SECTION 269. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill  5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased  by $3,616,453 for carrying out
the provisions of section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 104), and the
amendments to section 1, chapter 91, Oregon Laws 2022, by section 1, chapter  ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 104).
SECTION 270. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,300,000, for the Fire Hardening  Grant
Program.
SECTION 271. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs,  is decreased by
$2,500,000, to allow moneys to be carried forward to the next biennium for  assistance to
Afghan refugees.
SECTION 272. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  for self-sufficiency
programs, is increased by $2,500,000, for assistance to Afghan refugees.
SECTION 273. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$1,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Public Defense
Services Commission, for the Special Programs, Contracts  and Distributions Division, for an
Edward R. Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant.
SECTION 274. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $3,750,000, for distribution to the
Portland Opportunities Industrialization Center for community violence prevention  and
intervention grants.
SECTION 275. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (6), chapter _____,  Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill  5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for central services, is
increased by $2,000,000, for the health care interpreter program.
SECTION 276. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 36
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for crime victims and survivor services, for
community-based violence prevention grants.
SECTION 277. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, for the Deschutes County Courthouse renovation.
SECTION 278. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,593,100, to be allocated to the  Department of State Police for
issues related to firearm background checks.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 279. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Transportation, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of  $5,000,000, for distribution to the Malheur County De-
velopment Corporation, for the Treasure Valley Intermodal Facility Project.
SECTION 280. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled  House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for child welfare
programs, is increased by $6,796,689, for increased rates for behavior rehabilitation services.
SECTION 281. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill  5026), collected or received by the Department of Human Services,
for child welfare programs, is increased by $3,405,231, for  increased rates for behavior reha-
bilitation services.
SECTION 282.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, for the Columbia County Courthouse renovation.
SECTION 283. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Housing
and Community Services Department Revolving Account  established by ORS 456.574, for de-
velopment of affordable homes for purchase.
SECTION 284. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5511), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), collected or received  by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased  by $50,000,000, to provide finan-
cial assistance to aid in the  acquisition, renovation or maintenance of properties with
project-based federal  rental assistance contracts, public housing undergoing significant re-
capitalization or  publicly supported housing as defined in ORS 456.250 or to preserve the
affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
SECTION 285. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by section 5, chapter  ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for
debt service for bond-related activities, is increased by $26,488,111.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 37
SECTION 286. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 3, chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Housing and
Community Services  Department for lottery bonds, is increased by $2,507,603, for debt ser-
vice.
SECTION 287. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$29,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses for operations from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or  received by the Housing and Community Services De-
partment, for debt service.
SECTION 288.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2,  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5511), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development for
contract services, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), collected or received  by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $4,280,000,  for cost of issuance
on bonds issued pursuant to Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution for the Local Inno-
vation and Fast Track Housing and Permanent Supportive Housing programs.
SECTION 289.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5511), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in section 2,
chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5511), collected or received by the
Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $525,793, for cost of issuance
of bonds issued for the preservation of affordable housing.
SECTION 290. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $39,000,000, to be allocated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to pay for long term rental assistance.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 291. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5509), for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and includ-
ing federal funds from the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section  2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5509), collected or received by the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for debt ser-
vice, is increased by $40,000, for the cost of bond issuance.
SECTION 292. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Business Development
Department for the Oregon CHIPS Fund established by section 6,  chapter 25, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 4).
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 38
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
NOTE: Section 293 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 294. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter _____,  Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for Health Systems Di-
vision programs, is decreased by $34,912,629, to rebalance insurer’s tax revenue.
SECTION 295. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $34,912,629,  to rebalance
insurer’s tax revenue.
SECTION 296. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter _____,  Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for Health Systems Di-
vision programs, is decreased by $26,400,000, to rebalance tax revenue for crisis response.
SECTION 297. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws  2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon Health
Authority, for Health Systems Division programs, is increased by $32,961,422,  to rebalance
tax revenue for crisis response.
SECTION 298. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education  by section 2 (3), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for  youth development
programs, is increased by $2,000,000, for the  East Metro Outreach, Prevention, and Inter-
vention program.
SECTION 299. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 10, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payments of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department  of Education from
the Student Investment Account established under ORS 327.175, is increased by $146,321,804.
SECTION 300. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for
Oregon Health and Science University education  and other programs, is increased by
$500,000, to distribute to the Oregon Health and  Science University School of Public Health
to perform a public health study on the effects of current laws and policies on people in  the
sex trade in the state of Oregon.
SECTION 301. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for
programs and operations, is increased by  $1,200,000, for a grant to Self Enhancement, Inc.,
for the purpose of establishing an Underserved and Underrepresented Youth Cohort that  will
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 39
build a pipeline of diverse students who are ready to gain employment in the newly expanded
semiconductor industry following the students’ graduation  from high school or a post-
secondary institution of education.
SECTION 302. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for
programs and operations, is increased by  $2,000,000, for a grant to Building Blocks 2 Success
for the purpose of increasing workforce development in the semiconductor industry,  with a
focus on enhancing a Science, Technology, Engineering and Math  (STEM) pipeline program
for summer programming and college preparation for individuals who  will major in STEM
fields at historically Black colleges and universities.
SECTION 303. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, for
programs and operations, is increased by $586,500,  for a grant to REAP, Inc. to provide
funding for the REAP’s Young Entrepreneurs Program (YEP)  to create opportunities for
young entrepreneurs in outer east Portland.
SECTION 304. Sections 7, 8 and  10, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
3396), are repealed.
SECTION 305. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, which may  be expended to provide reimbursements
under section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3396).
SECTION 306.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, which may be expended to provide  reimbursements
under section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3396).
SECTION 307.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $1,517,041, which may be expended to support the task force
established in section 1, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3396), and ad-
minister the programs in sections 3,  4 and 5, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 3396).
SECTION 308.
In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, to distribute to Home Share
Oregon to provide grants to individuals participating in the home-sharing program to expand
access to affordable housing.
SECTION 309.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to distribute to the Oregon
Worker Relief Climate Change  Fund to provide temporary financial assistance to agricultural
workers who lose work or wages because of extreme heat or smoke.
SECTION 310. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $300,000,  for Enterprise Asset Manage-
ment, to contract  for an independent audit of land purchases by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission from fiscal years 2019 through 2023.
SECTION 311. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023  (Enrolled Senate
Bill 5525),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 40
receipts, marijuana  tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___,
Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5525), collected or received by the Oregon  Health
Authority, for public health, is increased by $4,400,000, for inhalant settlement proceeds.
SECTION 312. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $1,000,000, for distribution to the
Willamette Career Academy to fund  regional career and technical education programs pro-
vided by the Willamette Career Academy.
NOTE: Sections 313 to 315 were deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 316. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$12,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and including federal funds from the  United States Forest Service for fire protection and for
research projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  described in this section,
collected or received by the State Forestry Department, for the purchase of a  multi-mission
capable aircraft.
SECTION 317.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$264,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds and federal funds,  collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Human Services, for debt service.
SECTION 318. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Advocacy Commissions
Office:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 59 1 -88
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Chief Operating Office
General Fund SB 5502 1(1) -908
Other funds SB 5502 2(1) -54,148
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5502 1(6) -205,700
Chief Financial Office
Other funds SB 5502 2(2) -35,470
Office of the State Chief
Information Officer - Policy
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 41
Other funds SB 5502 2(3)(a) -279,598
Chief Human Resources Office
Other funds SB 5502 2(4) -104,645
OSCIO - State Data Center
- Operations
Other funds SB 5502 2(5)(a) -1,679,903
Enterprise Asset Management
Other funds SB 5502 2(6) +747,814
Enterprise Goods and
Services
Other funds SB 5502 2(7) -1,819,820
Business Services
Other funds SB 5502 2(8) +428,961
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds SB 5502 2(12) -1,975,174
ODAS Information Technology
Other funds SB 5502 2(14) -75,916
Debt Service and Related
Costs for Bonds Issued
Lottery funds SB 5502 3 +374,600
Public Records Advocate:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 63 1 +8,958
State Treasurer:
Administrative Services
Other funds HB 5042 1(1) -113,132
Trust Property Services
Other funds HB 5042 1(2) -50,403
Investment Services
Other funds HB 5042 1(3) -21,344
Public Savings Services
Other funds HB 5042 1(4) -17,554
State and Local Government
Financial Services
Other funds HB 5042 1(5) -6,773
Public Employees Retirement
System:
Central Administration
Division
Other funds HB 5033 1(1) -99,942
Financial and Administrative
Services Division
Other funds HB 5033 1(2) -1,220,406
Information Services
Division
Other funds HB 5033 1(3) -9,333
Operations Division
Other funds HB 5033 1(4) -10,953
Compliance, Audit and
Risk Division
Other funds HB 5033 1(5) -83,247
Secretary of State:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 42
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund HB 5035 1(1) -5,887
Other funds HB 5035 2(1) -59,946
Elections Division
General Fund HB 5035 1(2) -65,823
Other funds HB 5035 2(2) -42
Federal funds HB 5035 3 -7,212
Audits Division
Other funds HB 5035 2(3) -48,620
Archives Division
Other funds HB 5035 2(4) -76,291
Corporation Division
Other funds HB 5035 2(5) -48,178
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
Administrative Expenses
Other funds SB 5519 1(1) -85,429
Marijuana Regulation
- Recreational
Other funds SB 5519 1(2) -174,602
Marijuana Regulation
- Medical
Other funds SB 5519 1(3) -34,942
Capital Improvements
Other funds SB 5519 1(6) +6,012
Debt Service
Other funds SB 5519 1(7) -11,342,539
Department of Revenue:
Administration
General Fund HB 5034 1(1) -615,764
Other funds HB 5034 2(1) -186,696
Property Tax Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(2) -134,536
Other funds HB 5034 2(2) -4,114
Personal Tax and
Compliance Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(3) -173,625
Other funds HB 5034 2(3) -4,565
Business Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(4) -117,634
Other funds HB 5034 2(4) -44,527
Collections Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(5) -69,791
Other funds HB 5034 2(5) -7,505
Information Technology
Services Division
General Fund HB 5034 1(6) -190,043
Other funds HB 5034 2(7) -33,295
Debt Service and Related
Costs
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 43
General Fund HB 5034 1(7) -571,500
Corporate Division
Other funds HB 5034 2(6) -93,199
Marijuana Program
Other funds HB 5034 2(8) -12,696
Senior Property Tax
Deferral Program
Other funds HB 5034 2(9) -11,523
Employment Relations
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund Ch. 79 1 -47,287
Assessments of Agencies
Other funds Ch. 79 3 -31,546
Office of the Governor:
Operating Expenses
General Fund HB 5022 1 +287,101
Other funds HB 5022 4 -18,931
Regional Solutions
Lottery funds HB 5022 3 -30,723
Oregon Government Ethics
Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 61 1 -34,122
State Library:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5518 1 -2,470
Operating Expenses
- Assessments
Other funds SB 5518 3 -3,707
(2) CONSUMER AND BUSINESS SERVICES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Board of Accountancy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 78 1 -70,954
State Board of Tax
Practitioners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 64 1 -20,850
Construction Contractors
Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5009 1 -119,495
Mental Health Regulatory
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 44
Agency
Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors
and Therapists:
Other funds HB 5024 1 -40,962
Oregon Board of Psychology:
Other funds HB 5024 2 -30,704
State Board of Chiropractic
Examiners:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 60 1 -34,247
State Board of Licensed
Social Workers:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 80 1 -24,782
Oregon Board of Dentistry:
Operating Expenses
Other funds HB 5011 1 -26,936
Health-Related Licensing
Boards:
State Mortuary and Cemetery
Board
Other funds Ch. 62 1 -17,464
Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine
Other funds Ch. 62 2 -7,935
Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board
Other funds Ch. 62 3 -4,425
Board of Medical Imaging
Other funds Ch. 62 4 -16,941
State Board of Examiners
for Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology
Other funds Ch. 62 5 -8,911
Oregon State Veterinary
Medical Examining Board
Other funds Ch. 62 6 -12,230
Bureau of Labor and
Industries:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5515 1 -6,969
Other funds SB 5515 2 +43,893
Federal funds SB 5515 4 +8,023
Wage Security Fund
Administration
Other funds SB 5515 3(1) -44,098
Public Utility Commission:
Utility Program
Other funds SB 5534 1(1) -200,050
Residential Service
Protection Fund
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 45
Other funds SB 5534 1(2) -9,911
Administration
Other funds SB 5534 1(3) -192,659
Oregon Board of Maritime
Pilots
Other funds SB 5534 1(4) -10,714
Department of Consumer and
Business Services:
Workers’ Compensation
Board
Other funds HB 5010 1(1) -76,661
Workers’ Compensation
Division
Other funds HB 5010 1(2) -351,564
Oregon OSHA
Other funds HB 5010 1(3) -485,080
Central Services Division
Other funds HB 5010 1(4) -380,581
Division of Financial
Regulation
Other funds HB 5010 1(5) -398,262
Federal funds HB 5010 2(4) -191
Building Codes Division
Other funds HB 5010 1(6) -221,107
Real Estate Agency:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5536 1 -106,793
Oregon State Board of
Nursing:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5523 1 -108,458
Oregon Medical Board:
Operating Expenses
Other funds Ch. 94 1 -64,529
State Board of Pharmacy:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5529 1 -74,238
(3) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Oregon Arts Commission
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 46
General Fund SB 5524 1(1) -18,158
Business, Innovation and
Trade
Other funds SB 5524 4(2) -27,052
Lottery funds SB 5524 8(2) -79,287
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5524 1(2) -1,768,200
Infrastructure
Other funds SB 5524 4(3) -84,612
Lottery funds SB 5524 8(3) -27,520
Federal funds SB 5524 9(3) -1,910
Operations
Other funds SB 5524 4(1) -38,337
Lottery funds SB 5524 8(1) -188,478
Arts and Cultural Trust
Other funds SB 5524 4(4) -13,524
Lottery Bond Debt Service
Lottery funds SB 5524 8(5) -1,630,664
Arts
Federal funds SB 5524 9(4) -796
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5511 1 -5,193
Other funds SB 5511 2 -516,830
Federal funds SB 5511 4 -94,360
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5511 5 -15,398,550
Lottery funds SB 5511 3 -381,340
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Services Provided by
the department
General Fund SB 5538 1(1) -1,964
Veteran Loans, Oregon
Veterans’ Homes
Other funds SB 5538 4(1) -410,335
Employment Department:
Unemployment Insurance,
Shared Services and
Workforce Operations,
Contributions and Recovery,
and Workforce and
Economic Research
Other funds SB 5507 1(1) -1,214,960
Office of Administrative
Hearings
Other funds SB 5507 1(2) -110,980
Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Program
Other funds SB 5507 1(3) -256,472
Modernization Initiative
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 47
Other funds SB 5507 1(4) -193,149
Operating Budget
Federal funds SB 5507 4 -188,267
(4) EDUCATION.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission:
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5537 2 +135,100
Department of Education:
Operations
General Fund HB 5014 1(1) -808,087
Other funds HB 5014 6(2) -243,035
Federal funds HB 5014 8(1) -15,377
Debt Service for General
Obligation Bonds
General Fund HB 5014 4 -10,861,500
Debt Service for Lottery
Bonds
Lottery funds HB 5014 5 -254,270
Statewide Education
Initiatives Account
Other funds HB 5014 14 -39,900
Department of Early
Learning and Care:
Operations
General Fund HB 5013 1(1) -158,360
Other funds HB 5013 2(1) -22,639
Federal funds HB 5013 3(1) -335,349
Operations transfer from
Early Learning Account
Other funds HB 5013 4(1) -24,005
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
HECC programs, grants and
operations
General Fund HB 5025 1(1) -253,597
Other funds HB 5025 8(1) -103,417
Federal funds HB 5025 11 -77,996
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Community Colleges
General Fund HB 5025
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 48
1(11)(b) -215,470
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
General Fund HB 5025
1(11)(a) -2,589,620
Other funds HB 5025 8(3) +3,860,789
Lottery Debt Service - From
Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund
for Public Universities
Lottery funds HB 5025 2 -348,584
(5) HUMAN SERVICES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Long Term Care Ombudsman:
General Program and Services
Provided to Care Facility
Residents
General Fund SB 5520 1(1) -8,483
Public Guardian and
Conservator Program
General Fund SB 5520 1(2) -35,550
Operating Expenses
Other funds SB 5520 2 -431
Commission for the Blind:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5503 1 -4,489
Other funds SB 5503 2 -1,466
Federal funds SB 5503 3 -193,890
Psychiatric Security Review
Board:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5531 1 -144,327
Department of Human
Services:
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund HB 5026 1(2) -45,747
Other funds HB 5026 2(2) -8,010
Federal funds HB 5026 3(2) -55,630
Self-Sufficiency Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(3) -37,482
Other funds HB 5026 2(3) +45,842
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 49
Federal funds HB 5026 3(3) -1,913,658
Vocational Rehabilitation
Services
General Fund HB 5026 1(4) -249,097
Other funds HB 5026 2(4) -226
Federal funds HB 5026 3(4) -178,266
Child Welfare Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(5) -4,268
Other funds HB 5026 2(5) -46
Federal funds HB 5026 3(5) -12,176
Aging and People With
Disabilities Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(6) -3,638,074
Federal funds HB 5026 3(6) -2,777,031
Intellectual/Developmental
Disabilities Programs
General Fund HB 5026 1(7) -86,278
Other funds HB 5026 2(7) -1,920
Federal funds HB 5026 3(7) -75,334
Oregon Eligibility
Partnership
General Fund HB 5026 1(8) -49,411
Other funds HB 5026 2(9) -188,396
Federal funds HB 5026 3(8) -70,854
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5026 1(9) -2,855,780
Shared Services
Other funds HB 5026 2(8) -3
Oregon Health Authority:
Health Systems Division
Administration
General Fund SB 5525 1(1) -108,825
Other funds SB 5525 2(1) -23,630
Lottery funds SB 5525 3(1) -118
Federal funds SB 5525 5(1) -132,071
Health Policy and
Analytics
General Fund SB 5525 1(3) -9,317
Other funds SB 5525 2(3) -102,072
Federal funds SB 5525 5(3) -9,389
Public Health
General Fund SB 5525 1(4) -71,072
Other funds SB 5525 2(5) -181,068
Federal funds SB 5525 5(4) -35,201
Oregon State Hospital
General Fund SB 5525 1(5) -127,523
Federal funds SB 5525 5(5) -173
Central Services
General Fund SB 5525 1(6) -57,668
Other funds SB 5525 2(8) -4,348
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 50
Federal funds SB 5525 5(6) -8,170
State Assessments and
Enterprise-Wide Costs
General Fund SB 5525 1(7) -6,737,168
Other funds SB 5525 2(9) -935,819
Federal funds SB 5525 5(7) -1,740,455
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5525 1(9) -26,000
Lottery funds SB 5525 3(6) -297,770
Shared Administrative
Services
Other funds SB 5525 2(10) -8,195
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Commission on Judicial
Fitness and Disability:
Administration
General Fund SB 5513 1 +469
Judicial Department:
Operations
General Fund SB 5512 1(2) -718,094
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5512 1(5) +11,735,830
Public Defense Services
Commission:
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5532 1(9) -38,320
(7) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
General Program
General Fund SB 5516 1(1) -138,597
Debt Service
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 51
General Fund SB 5516 1(2) -262,710
Legislative Assembly:
Biennial General Fund
General Fund SB 5516 6 -35,197
Legislative Counsel
Committee:
General Program
General Fund SB 5516 11 -11,341
Legislative Fiscal
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5516 14(1) -1,644
Legislative Policy and
Research Committee:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5516 15 -31,806
Legislative Revenue
Officer:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5516 16 -123
Commission on Indian
Services:
Operating Expenses
General Fund SB 5516 17 -27,755
(8) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Marine Board:
Administration and
Education
Other funds SB 5521 1(1) -51,334
State Department of Energy:
Operations
Other funds HB 5016 2 -187,032
Federal funds HB 5016 4 -682
State Department of
Geology and Mineral
Industries:
Geologic Survey
General Fund SB 5510 1(1) -152,404
Other funds SB 5510 2(1) -8,674
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5527 1 -479,980
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 52
Lottery funds SB 5527 4 -176,730
Director’s Office
Other funds SB 5527 2(1) -194,559
Lottery funds SB 5527 3(1) -200,698
Central Services
Other funds SB 5527 2(2) -6,446
Land Use Board of Appeals:
General Fund HB 5028 1 +3,166
Water Resources Department:
Administrative Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(1) -128,974
Other funds HB 5043 3(1) -1,411
Field Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(2) -70,382
Other funds HB 5043 3(2) -22,459
Water Rights and
Adjudications
General Fund HB 5043 1(3) -1,898
Other funds HB 5043 3(3) -13,701
Technical Services
General Fund HB 5043 1(4) -15,302
Other funds HB 5043 3(4) -8,659
Director’s Office
General Fund HB 5043 1(5) -135,491
Other funds HB 5043 3(5) -2,284
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5043 2 -1,848,850
Oregon Watershed
Enhancement Board:
Operations
Lottery funds SB 5539 6 -37,082
Federal funds SB 5539 8(1) -2,010
Department of State Lands:
Common School Fund Programs
Other funds HB 5037 1(1) -1,033,674
South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve Operations
Other funds HB 5037 1(2) -551
State Department of
Agriculture:
Administrative and
Support Services
General Fund HB 5002 1(1) -7,939
Other funds HB 5002 2(1) -24,486
Food Safety
General Fund HB 5002 1(2) -146,393
Other funds HB 5002 2(2) -76,444
Federal funds HB 5002 4(2) -3,657
Natural Resources
General Fund HB 5002 1(3) -100,899
Other funds HB 5002 2(3) -85,074
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 53
Federal funds HB 5002 4(3) -7,759
Market Access
General Fund HB 5002 1(4) -70,353
Other funds HB 5002 2(4) -57,357
Federal funds HB 5002 4(4) -12,500
Parks and Natural
Resources Fund
Lottery funds HB 5002 3 -25,662
Department of Environmental
Quality:
Air Quality
General Fund HB 5018 1(1) -52,871
Other funds HB 5018 2(1) -45,159
Federal funds HB 5018 5(1) -29,250
Water Quality
General Fund HB 5018 1(2) -30,939
Other funds HB 5018 2(2) -45,630
Lottery funds HB 5018 3 -15,876
Federal funds HB 5018 5(2) -4,051
Land Quality
Other funds HB 5018 2(3) -95,880
Federal funds HB 5018 5(3) -4,485
Agency Management
General Fund HB 5018 1(4) -106,032
Other funds HB 5018 2(4) -1,075,511
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5018 1(5) -54,000
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Fish Division
Other funds SB 5509 2(1) -61,045
Lottery funds SB 5509 3(1) -36
Federal funds SB 5509 4(1) -147
Wildlife Division
General Fund SB 5509 1(2) -438
Other funds SB 5509 2(2) -31,224
Lottery funds SB 5509 3(2) -71
Federal funds SB 5509 4(2) -2,126
Administrative Services
Division
General Fund SB 5509 1(3) +269,384
Other funds SB 5509 2(3) +275,693
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5509 1(4) -382,000
Other funds SB 5509 2(5) +397,000
Habitat Division
General Fund SB 5509 1(7) -88
Other funds SB 5509 2(7) -184
Federal funds SB 5509 4(5) -156
State Forestry Department:
Agency Administration
Other funds HB 5020 2(1) +2,626,169
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 54
Federal funds HB 5020 4(1) -1
Fire Protection
General Fund HB 5020 1(1) -887
Other funds HB 5020 2(2) -4,060
Federal funds HB 5020 4(2) -32,311
Forest Resources
General Fund HB 5020 1(2) -8,670
Other funds HB 5020 2(4) -3,493
Federal funds HB 5020 4(4) -1,336
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5020 1(4) -475,849
Other funds HB 5020 2(7) -1,023,723
State Forests
Other funds HB 5020 2(3) -20,040
Planning Branch
Other funds HB 5020 2(5) -2,237
Federal funds HB 5020 4(5) -1
Equipment Pool
Other funds HB 5020 2(8) -2,414
Facilities Maintenance
and Management
Other funds HB 5020 2(9) -68
Department of Land
Conservation and Development:
Planning Program
General Fund HB 5027 1(1) -83,697
Other funds HB 5027 2 -4,883
Federal funds HB 5027 3 -27,346
Columbia River Gorge
Commission:
General Fund HB 5008 1 -2,316
(9) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Board of Parole and
Post-Prison Supervision:
General Fund SB 5528 1 -123,987
Department of State Police:
Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and Gaming
Enforcement
General Fund SB 5530 1(1) -515,411
Other funds SB 5530 2(1) -14,457
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 55
Federal funds SB 5530 3(1) +3,354
Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement
General Fund SB 5530 1(2) -60,650
Other funds SB 5530 2(2) -12,740
Lottery funds SB 5530 4 -4,669
Federal funds SB 5530 3(2) +668
Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner
General Fund SB 5530 1(3) -111,321
Other funds SB 5530 2(3) +36
Federal funds SB 5530 3(3) +122
Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services
General Fund SB 5530 1(4) -309,387
Other funds SB 5530 2(4) -81,792
Federal funds SB 5530 3(4) +2,409
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5530 1(5) -1,205,270
Department of Corrections:
Central Administration
and Administrative Services
General Fund SB 5504 1(2) +4,799,062
Other funds SB 5504 2(2) -28
Operations and Health
Services
Other funds SB 5504 2(1) -1,233,456
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5504 1(5) -1,399,249
Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission:
General Fund SB 5505 1 -54,539
Other funds SB 5505 3 -26,948
Federal funds SB 5505 4 -7,593
District Attorneys
and Deputies:
Department of Justice
for District Attorneys
General Fund HB 5012 1 +116,385
Department of Justice:
Office of the Attorney
General and Administration
General Fund SB 5514 1(1) -34,562
Other funds SB 5514 2(1) -103,368
Appellate Division
General Fund SB 5514 1(2) -3,440
Other funds SB 5514 2(2) -34,661
Criminal Justice Division
General Fund SB 5514 1(3) -7,917
Other funds SB 5514 2(5) -63,587
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 56
Federal funds SB 5514 3(2) -671
Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division
General Fund SB 5514 1(4) -2,735,992
Other funds SB 5514 2(6) -51,924
Federal funds SB 5514 3(3) -16,658
Defense of Criminal
Convictions
General Fund SB 5514 1(5) -137,026
Division of Child Support
General Fund SB 5514 1(6) -42,363
Other funds SB 5514 2(9) -99,437
Federal funds SB 5514 3(4) -492,101
Civil Enforcement Division
Other funds SB 5514 2(3) -617,364
Federal funds SB 5514 3(1) -13,755
Child Advocacy Division
Other funds SB 5514 2(4) -46,875
General Counsel Division
Other funds SB 5514 2(7) -47,075
Trial Division
Other funds SB 5514 2(8) -117,228
Oregon Military Department:
Administration
General Fund HB 5031 1(1) +53,241
Other funds HB 5031 2(1) -15,796
Operations
General Fund HB 5031 1(2) -17,190
Other funds HB 5031 2(2) -7,913
Federal funds HB 5031 3(1) -100,118
Community Support
General Fund HB 5031 1(3) -82,772
Other funds HB 5031 2(3) -11,618
Federal funds HB 5031 3(2) -39,102
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5031 1(4) -880,210
Department of Emergency
Management:
Administration
General Fund HB 5017 1(1) +1,405,312
Other funds HB 5017 2(1) -180
Preparedness and Response
General Fund HB 5017 1(2) -1
Federal funds HB 5017 3(2) -17
Debt Service
General Fund HB 5017 1(4) -299,560
9-1-1 Emergency Program
Other funds HB 5017 2(2) +279,561
Mitigation and Recovery
Federal funds HB 5017 3(3) -136
Department of Public
Safety Standards and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 57
Training:
Operations
Other funds SB 5533 2(1) -308,721
Federal funds SB 5533 3 -1,347
Public Safety Memorial Fund
Other funds SB 5533 2(2) +5,646
Oregon Youth Authority:
Facility Programs
General Fund SB 5541 1(1) -114,591
Community Programs
General Fund SB 5541 1(2) -166,261
Federal funds SB 5541 3(1) -28,219
Program Support
General Fund SB 5541 1(3) -1,231,862
Federal funds SB 5541 3(2) -40,380
Debt Service
General Fund SB 5541 1(6) -3,120,677
Department of the State
Fire Marshal:
Other funds HB 5036 2 -2,286,453
Federal funds HB 5036 3 -106
(10) TRANSPORTATION.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Aviation:
Operations
Other funds HB 5004 2(1) -9,938
Department of
Transportation:
Maintenance
Other funds HB 5040 2(2) +1,480,244
Project Delivery and
Support
Other funds HB 5040 2(3) -90,513
Local Government Program
Other funds HB 5040 2(4) -982
Driver and Motor Vehicle
Services
Other funds HB 5040 2(5) -184,961
Federal funds HB 5040 3(1) -1,762
Commerce and Compliance
Other funds HB 5040 2(7) -19,656
Policy, Data and Analysis
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 58
Other funds HB 5040 2(8) -17,946
Public Transportation
Other funds HB 5040 2(9) -67,102
Federal funds HB 5040 3(4) -88,712
Administrative Services
Other funds HB 5040 2(10) -3,333,524
Finance and Budget
Other funds HB 5040 2(11) -976,575
Debt Service
Lottery funds HB 5040 4 -76,660
SECTION 319. Section 423, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by section  122, chapter
21, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 5045), is amended to read:
Sec. 423.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following entities  for the following
purposes:
(1) Grande Ronde Hospital
Foundation for
[hospital equipment ............................ $ 5,000,000]
capacity building initiatives...... $ 5,000,000
(2) City of Ashland for the
Briscoe School Rehabilitation ........ $ 1,300,000
(3) Marion-Polk Food Share for
the AWARE Food Bank .................. $ 2,407,500
(4) Farmworker Housing Development
Corporation for the Cipriano
Ferrell Education Center
Renovation ..........................................$ 1,000,000
(5) Heart of Oregon Corps
Centralized Campus .......................... $ 2,000,000
(6) Eugene Civic Alliance
Civic Park ...........................................$ 6,000,000
(7) Lane County Fairgrounds
Multi-Use Facility ............................. $ 7,500,000
(8) Central Oregon
Intergovernmental Council
for the CORE3 (Central OR
Ready, Responsive,
Resilient) program ............................ $ 9,500,000
(9) Columbia Gorge Children’s
Advocacy Center (DBA
SafeSpace) for the Child
Abuse Assessment Center ............... $ 2,000,000
(10) City of Corvallis for Martin
Luther King, Jr. (MLK) Park
enhancements ..................................... $ 4,000,000
(11) Prairie City School District
#4 for the Bates Building
renovation ...........................................$ 430,000
(12) Prairie City Senior Citizens
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 59
for building renovation .................... $ 113,870
(13) Kids Club of Harney County
to support phase 2 of the
Geno’s Youth Center ........................ $ 1,340,213
(14) Oregon Food Bank for the
statewide warehouse ........................ $ 5,000,000
(15) City of Wilsonville for the
Transit Center ................................... $ 1,926,000
(16) Grant County Senior Citizens
Association for the Senior
Center flooring and air
purification system ........................... $ 36,129
(17) City of Independence to
support the 9th Street
Lift Station upgrade ......................... $ 2,000,000
(18) Benton County Crisis Center ......... $ 5,450,002
(19) Peace Village to support
SquareOne Villages .......................... $ 3,300,000
(20) MountainStar Family Relief
Nursery to support the
La Pine Satellite Location .............. $ 165,000
(21) Lane County for Emergency
Response Functionality .................... $ 5,000,000
(22) Health Care Hub of South
Deschutes County for the
La Pine Community Health
Center ..................................................$ 3,000,000
(23) Cultivate Initiatives for the
Resource Hub and Navigation
Center ..................................................$ 2,950,000
(24) City of Salem to support
Navigation Center ............................. $ 1,900,000
(25) The Canby Center to support
Thriving Together capital
improvements ..................................... $ 1,125,000
(26) City of Monmouth to support
the skate park replacement
and recreation park
improvements ..................................... $ 525,000
(27) Wheeler County to support
the Glover Hall renovation ............ $ 405,000
(28) Community Counseling Solutions
to support the Northeast
Oregon Regional Acute Care
Center ..................................................$ 4,590,000
(29) Newberg School District to
support the Old Renne Park
improvement .......................................$ 750,000
(30) Harney County Cultural Center
for County Fairgrounds ................... $ 1,360,000
(31) City of John Day to fund
the Grant Union High School
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 60
roof and the Humbolt
Elementary HVAC projects ............ $ 2,250,000
(32) Oasis Village to support
transitional housing in
Redmond..............................................$ 350,000
(33) City of Aurora Fire Station ........... $ 3,800,000
(34) Salem Housing Authority to
support Yaquina Hall ....................... $ 1,500,000
(35) Wallowa History Center to
support the restoration of
the Bear-Sleds Ranger
District Compound ............................ $ 500,000
SECTION 320.
This 2023 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 61